Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-604
Acquisition of property; petition of condemner; requirements.

The condemner shall set forth in the petition filed in the action to condemn and acquire the right to underground storage, referred to in section 57-603, whether any public owner has any interest which would be affected by underground storage in any of the lands in which such right to underground storage is required. Any such public owner having any such interest shall be served with notice of such petition in like manner as any condemnee, and such public owner shall, by instrument made by its proper officer or officers, grant such interest, but not more than the right to underground storage, to the condemner upon the payment to it by the condemner of compensation in such amount as shall have been fixed by the award in respect thereto, made in like manner as if such public owner were a condemnee.

Laws 1953, c. 191, § 3(2), p. 614.